Georgia statutes. TITLE 22 Eminent Domain
Article 1 Construction, Maintenance, and Operation of Telegraph and Telephone Lines Along Railroad Rights of Way

Cross references.

Similar provisions regarding exercise of power of eminent domain for purposes of constructing and operating telephone and telegraph lines along public highways or railroad rights of way, §

46-5-1

.

22-3-1.
Direction and contents of notice of condemnation.

When a telegraph or telephone company undertakes to condemn so much of the right of way of a railroad company as may be necessary for the purpose of constructing, maintaining, and operating its telegraph or telephone lines along and upon such right of way, the notice of condemnation provided for in Code Section 22-2-26 shall be directed to the railroad company and shall:

Set out the manner in which the telegraph or telephone company proposes to construct its lines on the right of way of the railroad company;

Fix the time when the hearing shall be had;

Give the name of the assessor selected by the telegraph or telephone company; and

Request the railroad company to select an assessor.

History.

Ga. L. 1898, p. 54, § 1; Civil Code 1910, § 5236; Code 1933, § 36-701.

22-3-2.
Manner of service of notice.

Notice of condemnation shall be served upon the railroad company in the manner provided for the service of other actions upon railroad companies. It shall not be necessary to serve such notice upon any person or corporation other than the railroad company in possession of and operating the railroad whose right of way is sought to be condemned by the telegraph or telephone company for its use; and only the interest of such railroad company so served shall be affected by the proceedings.

History.

Ga. L. 1898, p. 54, § 1; Civil Code 1910, § 5237; Code 1933, § 36-702.

22-3-3.
Necessity for only one proceeding; location of proceedings; form of assessors’ findings.

There need be but one condemnation proceeding against the same railroad company, which proceeding may be conducted in any county where service can be made upon the company as provided in Code Section 22-3-2. However, if the railroad company has a main or principal office located in this state, the proceeding shall be conducted in the county in which the main or principal office is located. The assessors shall make their findings of the damages to which the railroad company may be entitled by reason of the construction, maintenance, and operation of the telegraph or telephone lines in the manner set out in the notice.

History.

Ga. L. 1898, p. 54, § 1; Civil Code 1910, § 5238; Code 1933, § 36-703.

22-3-4.
Location of hearing before assessors; evidence upon which findings may be based.

The hearing may be conducted in the office of the judge of the probate court of the county in which the condemnation proceedings are had or at such other place as the assessors may fix. In assessing the damages to the railroad company, the assessors need not go upon or inspect the premises sought to be condemned, but they shall make their findings upon the testimony heard by them.

History.

Ga. L. 1898, p. 54, § 1; Civil Code 1910, § 5239; Code 1933, § 36-704.